Washington statutes.
RCW 11.08.240

Limitation on filing claim.

Any claimant to escheated funds or real property shall have seven years from the date of issuance of letters testamentary or of administration within which to file his or her claim. Such claim shall be filed with the court having original jurisdiction of the estate, and a copy thereof served upon the department of revenue, together with twenty days notice of the hearing thereon.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2010; 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 8; 1965 c 145 s 11.08.240. Prior: 1955 c 254 s 12.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 278: See notes following RCW 11.08.160.